src/fst/affixes/propernouns.lexc
!! # Buryaad proper noun morphology

!! This file add +N+Prop and points to the noun case morphology

LEXICON PROPX ! unclassified
PROP1 ;

LEXICON PROP1
+N+Prop: prop1_case1 ;
!+N+Pl:%>ууд case1 ;

LEXICON PROP2
+N+Prop: prop2_case2 ;
!+N+Pl:%>ууд case2 ;

! LEXICON CYRL-A_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON CYRL-K_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON CYRL-L_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON CYRL-T_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Deriv-RUS-AN_SURMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IJ_SURMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Deriv-RUS-IN_SURMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Deriv-RUS-KIJ_SURMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Deriv-RUS-OJ_SURMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Deriv-RUS-V_SURMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Deriv-RUS-YJ_SURMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP-PLC_KAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIT
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP-PLC_KUDO
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KAL_FEM
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KAL_MAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KIT_FEM
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KIT_MAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KIT_SUR
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KUDO_FEM
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KUDO_MAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KUDO_PATRFEM
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_KUDO_SURFEM
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: Prop_default_infl ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Sur: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_LAK_MAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_OSH_FEM
! +N+Prop+Sem/Fem: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_OSH_MAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PROP_OSH_PATRMAL
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich
! +N+Prop+Sem/Mal: Prop_default_infl ;
! 
! LEXICON Prop_default_infl
! +Sg: case1 ;

LEXICON prop1_case1
+Sg: case1 ;

LEXICON prop2_case2
+Sg: case2 ;
