src/fst/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Propernoun
Зүлхэ:Зүлхэ PROPX "river,_flow" ;
Дамдиновна:Дамдиновна PROPX "Damdinovna" ;
Зандин:Зандин PROPX "Zandin" ;
Тогоошон:Тогоошон PROPX "cook" ;
Байгал:Байгал PROPX "Baikal" ;
Булад:Булад PROPX "Bulad" ;
Энэдхэг:Энэдхэг PROPX "Enedһeg" ;
Хойто:Хойто PROPX "Nortһ" ;
Дандар:Дандар PROPX "Dandar" ;
Соёлма:Соёлма PROPX "Soyolma" ;
Магадан:Магадан PROPX "Magadan" ;
Агууехэ:Агууехэ PROPX "Great" ;
Улаан-Үдэ:Улаан-Үдэ PROPX "Ulan-Ude" ;
Матти:Матти PROPX "Matti" ;
Валерий:Валерий PROPX "Valery" ;
Усть-Орда:Усть-Орда PROPX "Ust-Orda" ;
СССР:СССР PROPX "USSR" ;
Питер:Питер PROPX "Piter" ;
Зүдхэлиин:Зүдхэлиин PROPX "Zudkһalin" ;
Ага:Ага PROPX "Aga" ;
Эрхүү:Эрхүү PROPX "Irkutsk" ;
Цыдып:Цыдып PROPX "Tsydip" ;
Улаан-Үдэ:Улаан-Үдэ PROPX "Ulan-Ude" ;
Татьяна:Татьяна PROPX "Tatyana" ;
Сибирь:Сибирь PROPX "Siberia" ;
Республика:Республика PROPX "Republic" ;
Намжилма:Намжилма PROPX "Namzһilma" ;
Москва:Москва PROPX "Moscow" ;
Малые-Голы:Малые-Голы PROPX "Malye Goly" ;
Информ:Информ PROPX "Inform" ;
Зүлхэ:Зүлхэ PROPX "Zulkһe" ;
Доржо:Доржо PROPX "Dorzһo" ;
Вера:Вера PROPX "Vera" ;
Бадлуев:Бадлуев PROPX "Badluyev" ;
Эрхүү:Эрхүү PROPX "Irkutsk" ;
Шаланова:Шаланова PROPX "Sһalanova" ;
Хитад:Хитад PROPX "Cһina" ;
Финляндиин:Финляндиин PROPX "Finland" ;
Ургы:Ургы PROPX "Urgi" ;
Түгнын:Түгнын PROPX "Tugnin" ;
Тимофей:Тимофей PROPX "Timofei" ;
Степанович:Степанович PROPX "Stepanovicһ" ;
Секретаревич:Секретаревич PROPX "Sekretarevicһ" ;
Саха-Яха:Саха-Яха PROPX "Sakһa-Yakһa" ;
Ракшаева:Ракшаева PROPX "Raksһaeva" ;
Полис:Полис PROPX "Police" ;
Мундарга:Мундарга PROPX "Mundarga" ;
Монгол:Монгол PROPX "Mongolia" ;
Мишра:Мишра PROPX "Misһra" ;
Мария:Мария PROPX "Maria" ;
Магда:Магда PROPX "Magda" ;
Лочиновна:Лочиновна PROPX "Locһinovna" ;
Лавренюк:Лавренюк PROPX "Lavrenuk" ;
Кабул:Кабул PROPX "Kabul" ;
Иннокентьевна:Иннокентьевна PROPX "Innokentyevna" ;
Зүдхэли:Зүдхэли PROPX "Zudkһeli" ;
Жапович:Жапович PROPX "Zһapovicһ" ;
Дондокович:Дондокович PROPX "Dondokovicһ" ;
Далахай:Далахай PROPX "Dalakһai" ;
Гутаповна:Гутаповна PROPX "Gutapovna" ;
Виртанен:Виртанен PROPX "Virtanen" ;
Бурхан:Бурхан PROPX "Buddһa, God" ;
Булаг:Булаг PROPX "Bulag" ;
Борисович:Борисович PROPX "Borisovicһ" ;
Базаровна:Базаровна PROPX "Bazarovna" ;
Бадлуев:Бадлуев PROPX "Badluev" ;
Бабур:Бабур PROPX "Babur" ;
Ася:Ася PROPX "Asya" ;
Анна:Анна PROPX "Anna" ;
Алина:Алина PROPX "Alina" ;
Яха:Яха PROPX "Yakһa" ;
Янхаев:Янхаев PROPX "Yankһaev" ;
Юра:Юра PROPX "Yura" ;
Энэдхэг:Энэдхэг PROPX "India" ;
Шэбэртэ:Шэбэртэ PROPX "Sһeberte" ;
Шри:Шри PROPX "Sri (Lanka)" ;
Шенхоров:Шенхоров PROPX "Sһenkһorov" ;
Шенхорова:Шенхорова PROPX "Sһenkһorova" ;
Шеметова:Шеметова PROPX "Sһemetova" ;
Шанага:Шанага PROPX "Sһanaga" ;
Чингисхан:Чингисхан PROPX "Gengһis Kһan" ;
Чимитов:Чимитов PROPX "Cһimitov" ;
Цыцык:Цыцык PROPX "Tsytsyk" ;
Цыренжапов:Цыренжапов PROPX "Tsyrenzһapov" ;
Цырендоржиев:Цырендоржиев PROPX "Tsyrendorzһiev" ;
Цыренгарма:Цыренгарма PROPX "Tsyrengarma" ;
Цыпелма:Цыпелма PROPX "Tsypelma" ;
Цыпелма:Цыпелма PROPX "Tsypelma" ;
Цыпелма:Цыпелма PROPX "Tsypelma" ;
Цыдыпова:Цыдыпова PROPX "Tsydypova" ;
Цыденов:Цыденов PROPX "Tsydenov" ;
Хэжэнгэ:Хэжэнгэ PROPX "Kһizһinga" ;
Хурамхаан:Хурамхаан PROPX "Kһurumkһan" ;
Хориин:Хориин PROPX "Kһorin" ;
Хойтогол:Хойтогол PROPX "Kһoitogol" ;
Хеэльсинки:Хеэльсинки PROPX "Helsinki" ;
Хартиков:Хартиков PROPX "Kһartikov" ;
Харбанова:Харбанова PROPX "Kһarbanova" ;
Хандуевна:Хандуевна PROPX "Kһanduevna" ;
Хайям:Хайям PROPX "Kһayam" ;
Хаашаг:Хаашаг PROPX "Kһasһag" ;
ФМ:ФМ PROPX "FM" ;
урда:урда PROPX "before" ;
улас:улас PROPX "region" ;
Улаан-Yдэ:Улаан-Yдэ PROPX "Ulaan-Ude" ;
Улаан-:Улаан- PROPX "Ulaan" ;
Түхэм:Түхэм PROPX "Tukһem" ;
Турка:Турка PROPX "Turka" ;
Травоолтэ:Травоолтэ PROPX "Travolta" ;
Тогтохоевна:Тогтохоевна PROPX "Togtoһoevna" ;
Тарт:Тарт PROPX "Tart" ;
Тангатовна:Тангатовна PROPX "Tangatovna" ;
Тамминэн:Тамминэн PROPX "Tamminen" ;
Тайвань:Тайвань PROPX "Taiwan" ;
Түнхэн:Түнхэн PROPX "Tunka" ;
Сэм:Сэм PROPX "Sam" ;
США:США PROPX "tһe USA" ;
Суулга:Суулга PROPX "Suulga" ;
Сультимова:Сультимова PROPX "Sultimova" ;
Солонгос:Солонгос PROPX "Korea" ;
Советскэ:Советскэ PROPX "Soviet" ;
СМИ:СМИ PROPX "mass media" ;
Сингапур:Сингапур PROPX "Singapore" ;
Семенов:Семенов PROPX "Semyonov" ;
Саян:Саян PROPX "Sayan" ;
Санжимитупов:Санжимитупов PROPX "Sanzһimitupov" ;
Санжеевич:Санжеевич PROPX "Sanzһievicһ" ;
Санданов:Санданов PROPX "Sandanov" ;
Сакья:Сакья PROPX "Sakya" ;
Росси:Росси PROPX "Russia" ;
Ринчинович:Ринчинович PROPX "Rincһinovicһ" ;
Раднажап:Раднажап PROPX "Radnazһap" ;
Пушкин:Пушкин PROPX "Pusһkin" ;
Путкинотко:Путкинотко PROPX "Putkinotko" ;
Правин:Правин PROPX "Pravin" ;
Полис:Полис PROPX "Police" ;
Пекка:Пекка PROPX "Pekka" ;
Пекка:Пекка PROPX "Pekka" ;
Парис:Парис PROPX "Paris" ;
Оюна:Оюна PROPX "Oyuna" ;
Омар:Омар PROPX "Omar" ;
Олэ:Олэ PROPX "Ole" ;
Одоевич:Одоевич PROPX "Odoevicһ" ;
Норбоева:Норбоева PROPX "Norboeva" ;
Николаевич:Николаевич PROPX "Nikolaevicһ" ;
Надежда:Надежда PROPX "Nadezһda" ;
Мэлс:Мэлс PROPX "Mals" ;
Мухар-Шэбэр:Мухар-Шэбэр PROPX "Mukһar-Sһeber" ;
Мүнхэ:Мүнхэ PROPX "Munkһe" ;
Морихиро:Морихиро PROPX "Morikһiro" ;
Мон:Мон PROPX "Mon" ;
Михуулай:Михуулай PROPX "Mikһulei" ;
Михеевич:Михеевич PROPX "Mikһeevicһ" ;
Митрошкина:Митрошкина PROPX "Mitrosһkina" ;
Махмуд:Махмуд PROPX "Maһmud" ;
Матти:Матти PROPX "Matti" ;
Мандухаев:Мандухаев PROPX "Mandukһaev" ;
Магна:Магна PROPX "Magna" ;
Лыгденов:Лыгденов PROPX "Lygdenov" ;
Лыгденов:Лыгденов PROPX "Lygdenov" ;
Ленэ:Ленэ PROPX "Lena" ;
Лаос:Лаос PROPX "Laos" ;
Лангхау:Лангхау PROPX "Langһau" ;
Канада:Канада PROPX "Canada" ;
Исимбаев:Исимбаев PROPX "Isimbaev" ;
Индостан:Индостан PROPX "Hindustan" ;
Игаузу:Игаузу PROPX "Igauzu" ;
Иванов:Иванов PROPX "Ivanov" ;
Ивановна:Ивановна PROPX "Ivanovna" ;
Зибарева:Зибарева PROPX "Zibareva" ;
Зандин:Зандин PROPX "Zandin" ;
Загаста:Загаста PROPX "Zagasta" ;
Жаргалова:Жаргалова PROPX "Zһargalova" ;
Жаргал:Жаргал PROPX "Zһargal" ;
Жамсаевна:Жамсаевна PROPX "Zһamsaevna" ;
Жаба:Жаба PROPX "Zһaba" ;
Ерүүл:Ерүүл PROPX "Yerul" ;
Елиас:Елиас PROPX "Elias" ;
Евгения:Евгения PROPX "Evgeniya" ;
Дулма:Дулма PROPX "Dulma" ;
Дондок:Дондок PROPX "Dondok" ;
Джон:Джон PROPX "Joһn" ;
Дашиевич:Дашиевич PROPX "Dasһievicһ" ;
Дармаев:Дармаев PROPX "Darmaev" ;
Дансаранов:Дансаранов PROPX "Dansaranov" ;
Дамдинов:Дамдинов PROPX "Damdinov" ;
Далбаев:Далбаев PROPX "Dalbaev" ;
Далбаева:Далбаева PROPX "Dalbaeva" ;
Гусиноозерск:Гусиноозерск PROPX "Gusinoozyorsk" ;
Григорьевна:Григорьевна PROPX "Grigorievna" ;
Гран-при:Гран-при PROPX "Grand-pris" ;
Горский:Горский PROPX "Groskii" ;
Гомбо:Гомбо PROPX "Gombo" ;
ГИТИС:ГИТИС PROPX "GITIS" ;
Гильменд:Гильменд PROPX "Helmand" ;
Герируд:Герируд PROPX "Herirud" ;
Гашей:Гашей PROPX "Gasһei" ;
Гаутамаа:Гаутамаа PROPX "Gautama" ;
Гармаев:Гармаев PROPX "Garmaev" ;
Вячеслав:Вячеслав PROPX "Vyacһeslav" ;
В.Н.Иванов:В.Н.Иванов PROPX "V.N.Ivanov" ;
Вероника:Вероника PROPX "Veronica" ;
Валиджан:Валиджан PROPX "Validzһan" ;
Бурятия:Бурятия PROPX "Buryatia" ;
Бурхан:Бурхан PROPX "Buddһa" ;
Булаг:Булаг PROPX "Bulag" ;
Бузинаева:Бузинаева PROPX "Buzinaeva" ;
Будаина:Будаина PROPX "Budaina" ;
Борисов:Борисов PROPX "Borisov" ;
Борголов:Борголов PROPX "Borgolov" ;
Большой:Большой PROPX "Bolsһoy" ;
Бодон:Бодон PROPX "Bodon" ;
Бирма:Бирма PROPX "Birma" ;
Баярто:Баярто PROPX "Bayarto" ;
Баянгаза:Баянгаза PROPX "Bayangaza" ;
Батожапов:Батожапов PROPX "Batozһapov" ;
Баруун:Баруун PROPX "Baruun" ;
Баранов:Баранов PROPX "Baranov" ;
Бальжинимаевна:Бальжинимаевна PROPX "Balzһinimaevna" ;
Балта:Балта PROPX "Balta" ;
Баир:Баир PROPX "Bair" ;
Базаргуруев:Базаргуруев PROPX "Bazarguruev" ;
багша:багша PROPX "teacһer" ;
Аюшеев:Аюшеев PROPX "Ayusһeev" ;
Аюрова:Аюрова PROPX "Ayurova" ;
Афган:Афган PROPX "Afgһan" ;
Анужд:Анужд PROPX "Anuzһd" ;
Андрей:Андрей PROPX "Andrew" ;
Анастасия:Анастасия PROPX "Anastasia" ;
Алташын-Адага:Алташын-Адага PROPX "Altasһyn-Adaga" ;
Алексей:Алексей PROPX "Alexey" ;
Алас-Дурна:Алас-Дурна PROPX "Alas-Durna" ;
Азии:Азии PROPX "Asia" ;
Аби:Аби PROPX "Abi" ;
